Maine, session 132, LD1273.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§54-F, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§2, is repealed.
Sec. A-2. 26 MRSA c. 7, sub-c. 6-C, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. A-3. PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §8 is repealed.
Sec. A-4. PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §9 is repealed.
Sec. A-5. PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §10 is repealed.
Sec. A-6. PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §11 is repealed.
Sec. A-7. Department of Labor to refund contributions made by employers
and self-employed individuals under former provision of law. The Department
of Labor shall refund to employers and self-employed individuals contributions made to
the Department of Labor pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 26, section 850-F.
An employer that deducted a portion of the premium required for an employee from that
employee's wages shall remit that portion of the premium to the employee as part of the
employee's wages.
Sec. A-8. Transfer; Department of Labor, Paid Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before
June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall transfer all unappropriated funds from the
Department of Labor, Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund, Other Special
Revenue Funds account to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund.
Sec. A-9. Retroactivity. That section of this Part that repeals the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 6-C applies retroactively to October 25, 2023.
PART B
Sec. B-1. 3 MRSA §959, sub-§1, ¶I, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§1, is further amended by amending subparagraph (5) to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0757(01)

(5) The voluntary paid family and medical leave benefits program established in
Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 6‑C 6-D in 2029.
Sec. B-2. 26 MRSA §42, first ¶, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §3, is
further amended to read:
The bureau shall collect, assort and arrange statistical details relating to all departments
of labor and industrial pursuits in the State; to trade unions and other labor organizations
and their effect upon labor and capital; to the number and character of industrial accidents
and their effect upon the injured, their dependent relatives and upon the general public; to
other matters relating to the commercial, industrial, social, educational, moral and sanitary
conditions prevailing within the State, including the names of firms, companies or
corporations, where located, the kind of goods produced or manufactured, the time operated
each year, the number of employees classified according to age and sex and the daily and
average wages paid each employee; and the exploitation of such other subjects as will tend
to promote the permanent prosperity of the industries of the State. The director is authorized
and empowered, subject to the approval of the Governor, to accept from any other agency
of government, individual, group or corporation such funds as may be available in carrying
out this section, and meet such requirements with respect to the administration of such
funds, not inconsistent with this section, as are required as conditions precedent to receiving
such funds. An accounting of such funds and a report of the use to which they were put
must be included in the biennial report to the Governor. Each agency of government shall
cooperate fully with the bureau's efforts to compile labor and industrial statistics. The
director shall cause to be enforced all laws regulating the employment of minors; all laws
established for the protection of health, lives and limbs of operators in workshops and
factories, on railroads and in other places; all laws regulating the payment of wages; and
all laws enacted for the protection of the working classes. During an investigation to
enforce those laws, the director may request records and other information relating to an
employer's compliance with unemployment compensation and workers' compensation
laws, including information needed to determine whether the employer has properly
classified a worker as an independent contractor, and shall report suspected violations of
those laws to the state or federal agency responsible for enforcing them. The director may
adopt, in accordance with the Maine Administrative Procedure Act, rules regarding all such
laws, except where this authority is granted to a board or commission. Rules adopted
pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A. The director shall, on or before the first day of July, biennially, report to
the Governor, and may make such suggestions and recommendations as the director may
deem necessary for the information of the Legislature. The director may from time to time
cause to be printed and distributed bulletins upon any subject that is of public interest and
benefit to the State, including, but not limited to, the voluntary paid family and medical
leave benefits program established in chapter 7, subchapter 6‑C 6-D, and may conduct a
program of research, education and promotion to reduce industrial accidents. The director
may review various data, such as workers' compensation records, as well as other
information relating to any public or private employer's safety experience. When any
individual public or private employer's safety experience causes the director to question
seriously the safe working environment of that employer, the director may offer any safety
education and consultation programs to that employer that may be beneficial in providing
a safer work environment. If the employer refuses this assistance or is in serious
noncompliance which that may lead to injuries, or if serious threats to worker safety
Page 2 - 132LR0757(01)

418 continue, then the director shall communicate concerns to appropriate agencies, such as the
429 United States Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration. As
530 used in this section, the term "noncompliance" means a lack of compliance with any
541 applicable health and safety regulations of the United States Department of Labor,
552 Occupational Safety and Health Administration or other federal agencies. The bureau is
563 responsible for the enforcement of indoor air quality and ventilation standards with respect
574 to state-owned buildings and buildings leased by the State. The bureau shall enforce air
585 quality standards in a manner to ensure that corrections to problems found in buildings be
596 made over a reasonable period of time, using consent agreements and other approaches as
1507 necessary and reasonable.
Sec. B-3. 26 MRSA §42-B, sub-§1, ¶H, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§6, is amended to read:
H. Paid Voluntary paid family and medical leave as provided in chapter 7, subchapter
6‑C 6-D.
Sec. B-4. 26 MRSA c. 7, sub-c. 6-D is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 6-D
VOLUNTARY PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE PROGRAM
§850-S. Definitions
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Average weekly wage. "Average weekly wage," as used to establish the maximum
weekly benefit amount for purposes of this subchapter, means 1/52 of aggregate total wages
paid in the State for a covered individual, as reported on employer contribution reports for
the calendar year, divided by the arithmetic mean of midmonth weekly covered
employment reported on employer contribution reports for the calendar year in the form
and manner determined by the department.
2. Commissioner. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Labor.
3. Covered individual. "Covered individual" means a person who is:
A. An employee employed by an employer that purchases paid family and medical
leave coverage in accordance with this subchapter; and
B. An employee employed by an employer that has not purchased paid family and
medical leave coverage in accordance with this subchapter who voluntarily purchases
paid family and medical leave coverage on an individual basis.
4. Covered service member. "Covered service member" means:
A. A member of the United States Armed Forces, including the National Guard and
the Reserves of the United States Armed Forces, who is:
(1) Undergoing medical treatment, recuperation or therapy or otherwise receiving
outpatient treatment; or
Page 3 - 132LR0757(01)

(2) Otherwise on the United States Armed Forces' temporary disability retired list
for a serious injury or illness that was incurred by the member in the line of duty
in the United States Armed Forces or a serious injury or illness that existed before
the beginning of the member's active duty and was aggravated by service in the
line of duty on active duty in the United States Armed Forces; or
B. A former member of the United States Armed Forces, including the National Guard
and the Reserves of the United States Armed Forces, who is undergoing medical
treatment, recuperation or therapy for a serious injury or illness that was incurred by
the member in the line of duty in the United States Armed Forces or a serious injury or
illness that existed before the beginning of the member's active duty and was
aggravated by service in the line of duty on active duty in the United States Armed
Forces and manifested before or after the member was discharged or released from
service.
5. Department. "Department" means the Department of Labor.
6. Domestic partner. "Domestic partner" has the same meaning as in Title 1, section
72, subsection 2‑C.
7. Employee. "Employee" means a person who may be permitted, required or directed
by an employer in consideration of direct or indirect gain or profit to engage in any
employment in the State but does not include an independent contractor.
8. Employer. "Employer" means any person, sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, association or other business entity that employs 50 or more employees at a
location in this State. "Employer" includes:
A. The State, including the executive, legislative and judicial branches, and a state
department or agency;
B. A county, city, town or municipal agency; and
C. A public employer, as defined in section 962, subsection 7.
"Employer" does not include the Federal Government.
9. Employment. "Employment" means a service performed for wages.
10. Employment benefits. "Employment benefits" means all benefits provided or
made available to employees by an employer, including, but not limited to, group life
insurance, health insurance, disability insurance, sick leave, annual or vacation leave,
educational benefits and pensions.
11. Family leave. "Family leave" means leave taken pursuant to section 850‑T,
subsection 2.
12. Family member. "Family member" means, with respect to a covered individual
or spouse or domestic partner of a covered individual:
A. Regardless of age, a child, including a child whose parentage has been determined
under the Maine Parentage Act or any other biological child, adopted child, foster child
or stepchild, or a child to whom the covered individual or spouse or domestic partner
of the covered individual stands in loco parentis or a child the covered individual or
spouse or domestic partner of the covered individual has under legal guardianship or
any individual to whom the covered individual or spouse or domestic partner of the
Page 4 - 132LR0757(01)

413 covered individual stood in any of these relationships when the individual was a minor
424 child;
B. A parent, including a legal parent, biological parent, adoptive parent, foster parent,
stepparent, de facto parent or legal guardian or a person who stood in loco parentis
when the covered individual or spouse or domestic partner of the covered individual
was a minor child;
C. A grandparent, including a legal grandparent, biological grandparent, adoptive
grandparent, foster grandparent, stepgrandparent or de facto grandparent;
D. A grandchild, including a legal grandchild, biological grandchild, adoptive
grandchild, foster grandchild, stepgrandchild or de facto grandchild;
E. A sibling, including a legal sibling, biological sibling, adoptive sibling, foster
sibling, stepsibling or de facto sibling;
F. A spouse or domestic partner of a covered individual; or
G. As designated by the covered individual in accordance with rule, an individual with
whom the covered individual has a significant personal bond that is or is like a family
relationship, regardless of biological or legal relationship.
13. Medical leave. "Medical leave" means leave taken pursuant to section 850‑T,
subsection 3.
14. Qualifying exigency. "Qualifying exigency" means an exigency determined
pursuant to the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 United States Code,
Section 2612(a)(1)(E).
15. Serious health condition. "Serious health condition" means an illness, injury,
impairment, pregnancy, recovery from childbirth or physical, mental or psychological
condition that involves inpatient care in a hospital, hospice or residential medical care
center or continuing treatment by a health care provider.
16. Spouse. "Spouse" has the same meaning as in Title 18‑C, section 1‑201,
subsection 54.
17. State average weekly wage. "State average weekly wage" means the average
weekly wage as published by the department for the State as a whole for the 12 most
recently reported months.
18. Wages. "Wages" includes, but is not limited to, salary, wages, tips, commissions
and other compensation as determined by rule.
§850-T. Voluntary paid family and medical leave coverage
1. Voluntary paid family and medical leave coverage. In accordance with this
section, after a competitive bidding process subject to the requirements of Title 5, section
1816‑B, the commissioner shall contract with an insurance company authorized to do
business in this State to provide voluntary paid family and medical leave coverage to
employers with 50 or more employees and to individuals who elect to participate.
A. The commissioner shall issue the request for proposals as part of the competitive
bidding process no later than January 1, 2026.
Page 5 - 132LR0757(01)

B. The commissioner shall consult with the Superintendent of Insurance when
evaluating proposals submitted by insurance companies in response to the request for
bids.
C. The insurance company contracted under this section is subject to all applicable
insurance laws and regulations of the State, and the rates and forms for paid family and
medical leave benefits must be filed for approval with the Superintendent of Insurance
in accordance with the requirements of Title 24-A.
D. The coverage for voluntary paid family and medical leave benefits must be available
for purchase by employers and individuals no later than January 1, 2027.
2. Family leave eligibility. A covered individual is eligible for family leave for any
of the following reasons:
A. To bond with the covered individual's child during the first 12 months after the
child's birth or the first 12 months after the placement of the child for adoption or foster
care with the covered individual;
B. To care for a family member with a serious health condition;
C. To attend to a qualifying exigency;
D. To care for a family member of the covered individual who is a covered service
member; or
E. Any other reason set forth in section 843, subsection 4.
3. Medical leave eligibility. A covered individual with a serious health condition that
makes the covered individual unable to work is eligible for medical leave.
4. Maximum leave requirements. The following requirements apply to leave taken
under this subchapter:
A. A covered individual is not eligible for more than 6 weeks of family leave in a
benefit year;
B. A covered individual is not eligible for more than 6 weeks of medical leave in a
benefit year; and
C. A covered individual may not take more than 6 weeks, in the aggregate, of family
leave and medical leave under this subchapter in the same benefit year.
This subsection does not prevent a covered individual from taking medical leave that is
immediately followed by family leave when the medical leave is taken during pregnancy
or recovery from childbirth and is supported by documentation from a health care provider.
5. Maximum benefit amount. Subject to subsection 7, the following provisions apply
to leave taken under this subchapter:
A. A covered individual must receive 60% of the covered individual's average weekly
wage; and
B. Wages used to determine the amount required to be paid under paragraph A are
capped at the benefit base limit established annually by the federal Social Security
Administration for purposes of the federal Old-Age, Survivors, and Disability
Insurance program limits pursuant to 42 United States Code, Section 430.
Page 6 - 132LR0757(01)

6. Voluntary participation. The offer of paid family and medical leave coverage by
an employer pursuant to this subchapter is voluntary. A participating employer may choose
to provide coverage at no cost to its employees or on a contributory or partially contributory
basis.
7. Other provisions of coverage authorized. As part of the request for proposals
issued pursuant to subsection 1, paragraph A, the commissioner shall establish the
following additional elements of the benefit structure for voluntary paid family and medical
leave coverage:
A. The base period by which the average weekly wage must be determined;
B. The tenure requirement, expressed in terms of months of work, to be met before an
employee is eligible to be covered, except that a tenure requirement may not apply to
an employee who has already met the requirement and then changes jobs;
C. Any waiting period or elimination period, except that a waiting period is not a
required element of the benefit structure and the commissioner may implement a plan
without such a requirement;
D. The minimum participation requirement;
E. The parameters for open enrollment periods through which employers that choose
to sponsor coverage may contract directly with the insurance company contracted
pursuant to subsection 1;
F. The parameters for individuals who work for employers that choose not to offer paid
family and medical leave coverage under this subchapter or that do not offer paid
family and medical leave coverage that is at least equivalent to the coverage available
under this subchapter to have the opportunity to contract indirectly with the insurance
company contracted pursuant to subsection 1 through a purchasing pool for
individuals;
G. Procedures for the establishment of a premium rate for employers and individuals
to purchase paid family and medical leave coverage based on actuarially justified rating
factors; and
H. Procedures for payroll deduction and premium remittance for employers with 50 or
more employees for contributory plans, partially contributory plans and
noncontributory plans for employers.
8. Consulting actuary. In carrying out the requirements of this subchapter, the
commissioner may retain a consulting actuary or other benefit advisor.
9. Employer outreach. The commissioner shall develop and implement an outreach
program to ensure that employers that might benefit from sponsoring paid family and
medical leave coverage for their employees and individuals who may be eligible to
purchase paid family and medical leave coverage are made aware of this program.
10. Annual report. Beginning January 1, 2028 and annually thereafter, the
commissioner shall submit a report on the voluntary paid family and medical leave
coverage provided under this subchapter to the Governor and to the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over labor matters.
Page 7 - 132LR0757(01)

11. Rules. The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
subchapter. Rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter are routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
§850-U. Employer requirements; return to work from family or medical leave
1. Restoration to position upon return to work. Except for an employee who has
not been employed for at least 120 days, an employee who exercises the right to family
leave or medical leave under this subchapter is entitled, upon return from that leave, to be
restored by the employer to the position held by the employee when the leave commenced
or to be restored to an equivalent position with equivalent employment benefits, pay and
other terms and conditions of employment.
2. Retaliation prohibited. An employer may not discharge, fire, suspend, expel or
discipline, through the application of attendance policies or otherwise, or threaten or in any
manner discriminate against an employee for the exercise of any right to which the
employee is entitled under this subchapter or with the purpose of interfering with the
exercise of any right to which the employee is entitled under this subchapter.
3. Enforcement; violation. The department shall take enforcement action against an
employer for a violation of this section.
§850-V. Effect of existing employer benefits for family and medical leave
This subchapter may not be construed to prohibit an employee entitled to receive
benefits for family leave or medical leave under a collective bargaining agreement or
employer policy from also receiving benefits under this subchapter as long as the employee
is otherwise eligible for benefits under this subchapter.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.